Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.240

Execution of entity filing.

(1) Any person who executes a record the person knows is false in any material respect with the intent the record be an entity filing is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) A person that executes an entity filing as an agent or legal representative thereby affirms as a fact that the person is authorized to execute the entity filing.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1209.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.